District of Columbia statutes.
42-2027

Subchapter supplements existing code provisions; exception where conflict arises.

The provisions of the subchapter shall be in addition to and supplemental to all other provisions of law of the District of Columbia and wheresoever there appears in the provisions the words “square”, “lot”, “land”, “ground”, “parcel”, “property”, “block”, or other designation denoting a unit of land, where appropriate to implement this subchapter, after such descriptive terms, there shall be deemed inserted reference to a condominium unit, condominium subdivision, or horizontal property regime, whichever shall be appropriate to effect the ends and purposes of this subchapter; provided, that wherever the application of the provisions of this subchapter conflict with the application of such other provisions, the provisions of law generally applicable to buildings in like use in the District of Columbia shall prevail.

Dec. 21, 1963, 77 Stat. 460, Pub. L. 88-218, § 27
Supersedure of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-2001.
1973 Ed., § 5-927.
1981 Ed., § 45-1727.